vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị điện gia dụng > Phụ kiện máy điều hòa: Giá Đỡ Máy Lạnh; Vỏ bọc máy điều hòa; Phin lọc bụi máy lạnh; Ống Dẫn Máy Lạnh; Bộ Dụng Cụ Lắp Đặt Máy Lạnh; Điều Khiển Máy Lạnh
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče – příslušenství > Klimatizace – příslušenství: Držáky klimatizací; Kryty klimatizací; Filtry do klimatizací; Hadice klimatizací; Instalační sady klimatizace; Dálkové ovladače klimatizací
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Pribor za kućanske aparate > Pribor za klima uređaje: Nosači za klima uređaje; Navlake za klima uređaje; Filtri za klima uređaje; Crijeva za klima uređaje; Kompleti za postavljanje klima uređaja; Daljinski upravljači za klima uređaje
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Аксесоари за домакински уреди > Аксесоари за климатици: Конзоли за климатици; Капаци за климатици; Филтри за климатик; Маркучи за климатици; Комплекти за монтаж на климатик; Дистанционни управления за климатик
nb: Hjem og hage > Tilbehør til husholdningsapparater > Tilbehør til klimaanlegg: Braketter til klimaanlegg; Deksler til klimaanlegg; Filtre til klimaanlegg; Slanger til klimaanlegg; Installasjonssett for klimaanlegg; Aircondition-fjernkontroller
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte-Zubehör > Klimaanlagen-Zubehör: Halterungen für Klimaanlagen; Abdeckungen für Klimaanlagen; Klimaanlagenfilter; Klimaanlagenschläuche; Klimaanlagen-Installationssets; Klimaanlagen-Fernbedienungen
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dodatki za gospodinjske aparate > Dodatki za klimatske naprave: Nosilci za klimatske naprave; Pokrovi za klimatske naprave; Filtri za klimatske naprave; Cevi za klimatske naprave; Kompleti za montažo klimatske naprave; Daljinski upravljalniki za klimatske naprave
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電関連用品 > エアコン関連用品: エアコン用ブラケット; エアコン室外機カバー; エアコンフィルター; エアコン用ホース; エアコン取り付けキット; エアコンリモコン
ru: Дом и сад > Аксессуары для бытовой техники > Аксессуары для кондиционеров: Крепеж для кондиционеров; Чехлы для кондиционеров; Фильтры для кондиционеров; Шланги для кондиционеров; Комплекты для установки кондиционера; Пульты дистанционного управления для кондиционеров
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องปรับอากาศ: โครงยึดเครื่องปรับอากาศ; ที่คลุมเครื่องปรับอากาศ; ตัวกรองเครื่องปรับอากาศ; ท่อแอร์; ชุดเครื่องมือติดตั้งแอร์; รีโมตคอนโทรลเครื่องปรับอากาศ
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Príslušenstvo k domácim spotrebičom > Príslušenstvo ku klimatizácii: Držiaky na klimatizáciu; Kryty na klimatizáciu; Filtre klimatizácie; Hadice ku klimatizácii; Sady na montáž klimatizácie; Diaľkové ovládače klimatizácií
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice > Accesorii pentru aparate de aer condiționat: Suporturi pentru aparate de aer condiționat; Huse pentru aparate de aer condiționat; Filtre pentru aparate de aer condiționat; Furtunuri pentru aparate de aer condiționat; Kituri de instalare a aparatelor de aer condiționat; Telecomenzi pentru aparate de aer condiționat
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家电配件 > 空调配件: 空调支架; 空调罩; 空调过滤网; 空调软管; 空调安装套件; 空调遥控器
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos > Acessórios para ar condicionado: Suportes para ar-condicionado; Protetores de ar-condicionado; Filtros de ar condicionado; Mangueiras para ar-condicionado; Kit de instalação para ar condicionado; Controles remotos para ar condicionado
pl: Dom i ogród > Akcesoria do sprzętu AGD > Akcesoria do klimatyzatorów: Uchwyty do klimatyzatorów; Osłony do klimatyzatorów; Filtry do klimatyzatorów; Wężyki do klimatyzatorów; Zestawy montażowe do klimatyzatorów; Piloty do klimatyzatorów
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliance Accessories > Air Conditioner Accessories: Air Conditioner Brackets; Air Conditioner Covers; Air Conditioner Filters; Air Conditioner Hoses; Air Conditioner Installation Kits; Air Conditioner Remote Controls
fr: Maison et jardin > Accessoires pour appareils électroménagers > Accessoires pour climatiseurs: Supports pour climatiseur; Protections pour climatiseurs; Filtres pour climatiseurs; Tuyaux pour climatiseur; Kit d'installation de climatiseur; Télécommandes pour climatiseur
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 부대용품 > 에어컨 부대용품: 에어컨 브래킷; 에어컨 커버; 에어컨 필터; 에어컨 호스; 에어컨 설치 키트; 에어컨 리모컨
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartásigép-kiegészítők > Légkondicionáló-kiegészítők: Légkondicionáló tartókonzolok; Légkondicionálóburkolatok; Légkondicionálószűrők; Légkondicionáló tömlők; Klímabeszerelő készlet / csomag; Légkondicionáló távirányítók
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器配件 > 空調配件: 空調支架; 空調設備保護罩; 空調濾網; 空調風管; 空調安裝工具包; 空調遙控器
es: Casa y jardín > Accesorios para electrodomésticos > Accesorios para el aire acondicionado: Soportes para aire acondicionado; Cubiertas para aire acondicionado; Filtros de aire acondicionado; Mangueras para aire acondicionado; Kits de instalación de aire acondicionado; Controles remotos para aire acondicionado
nl: Huis en tuin > Accessoires voor huishoudelijke apparaten > Accessoires voor airconditioning: Airconditionerbeugels; Afdekhoezen voor airconditioners; Airconditioningfilters; Airconditionerslangen; Installatiesets voor airconditioners; Airconditioning afstandsbedieningen
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ κλιματιστικών: Βάσεις κλιματιστικών; Καλύμματα κλιματιστικών; Φίλτρα κλιματιστικών; Σωλήνες κλιματιστικών; Κιτ εγκατάστασης κλιματιστικών; Τηλεχειριστήρια κλιματιστικών
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinės technikos priedai > Oro kondicionierių priedai: Oro kondicionierių laikikliai; Oro kondicionierių dangteliai; Oro kondicionierių filtrai; Oro kondicionierių žarnos; Kondicionierių montavimo rinkiniai; Oro kondicionierių nuotolinio valdymo pultai
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater – tilbehør > Aircondition – tilbehør: Beslag til klimaanlæg; Aircondition – covers; Aircondition – filtre; Slangesæt til klimaanlæg; Installationssæt til klimaanlæg; Fjernbetjeninger til klimaanlæg
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneiden lisätarvikkeet > Ilmastointilaitteen tarvikkeet: Ilmastointilaitteen kiinnikkeet; Ilmastointilaitteen kotelointi; Ilmastointilaitteen suodattimet; Ilmastointilaitteen letkut; Ilmastointilaitteiden asennussarjat; Ilmastointilaitteen kaukosäätimet
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Acessórios de eletrodomésticos > Acessórios de ar condicionado: Suportes para ar condicionado; Tampas de ar condicionado; Filtros de ar condicionado; Mangueiras para ar condicionado; Kits de instalação de ar condicionado; Comandos para ar condicionado
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aleti Aksesuarları > Klima Aksesuarları: Klima Braketleri; Klima Motoru Muhafazaları; Klima Filtreleri; Klima Hortumları; Klima Montaj Kitleri; Klima Uzaktan Kumandaları
sv: Hem och trädgård > Tillbehör till hushållsapparater > Tillbehör till luftkonditionering: Fästen för luftkonditionering; Höljen för luftkonditionering; Luftkonditioneringsfilter; Höljen för luftkonditionering; Installationssatser för luftkonditionering; Fjärrkontroller för luftkonditionering
it: Casa e giardino > Accessori elettrodomestici > Accessori per condizionatori: Staffe per condizionatori; Coperture per condizionatori; Filtri per condizionatori; Tubi per condizionatori; Kit di installazione del condizionatore d'aria; Telecomandi del condizionatore d'aria